Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 6
WATER SUPPLY

Cross references.

- Local government water supply projects, T. 36, C. 91, A. 4.

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1989 enactment of this article, see 6 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 163 (1989).

12-5-470. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Water Supply Act of 2008."

(Code 1981, §

12-5-470

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1304, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Georgia Wetlands:
Values, Trends, and Legal Status," see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 791 (1990).

12-5-470.1. Construction with other provisions.

The exercise of any powers conferred by this article shall be subject to applicable law governing eminent domain and the allocation and distribution of the waters of the state.

Nothing in this article shall alter or abrogate any provisions of this chapter or any rules, regulations, or state-wide or regional water plans pursuant thereto regarding interbasin or intrabasin transfer of waters.

Projects provided for by this article shall comply with Article 8 of this chapter and any rules, regulations, or state-wide or regional water plans pursuant thereto.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to diminish the full authority and responsibility of the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the department for existing statutory reviews and approvals.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-470.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

12-5-471. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Authority" means the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority created by Code Section 50-23-3.

(1.1) "County" means any county created under the Constitution or laws of this state.

(1.2) "Director" means the director of the division.

(1.3) "Division" means the Water Supply Division of the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority created by Code Section 50-23-26.

"Environmental services" means the provision, collectively or individually, of water facilities or management services.

"Lease" includes a lease or sublease and may, in the discretion of the division, be in form and substance an estate for years, usufruct, license, concession, or any other right or privilege to use or occupy.

"Lessee" includes lessee or sublessee, tenant, licensee, concessionaire, or other person contracting for any estate for years, usufruct, license, concession, or other right or privilege referred to in paragraph (3) of this Code section.

"Local government" or "local governing authority" means any municipal corporation or county, any local water district, or any state or local authority, board, or political subdivision created by the General Assembly or pursuant to the Constitution and laws of this state.

"Management services" means technical, administrative, instructional, or informational services provided to any current or potential recipient in, but not limited to, the areas of service charge structure; accounting, capital improvements budgeting or financing; financial reporting, treasury management, debt structure or administration or related fields of financial management; contract or grant administration; management of water systems; and economic development administration or strategies. Management services may be furnished either directly, on site, or through other written or oral means of communication and may consist of reports, studies, presentations, or other analyses of a written or oral nature.

"May" means permission and not command.

"Municipal corporation" or "municipality" means any city or town in this state.

"Obligation" means any bond, revenue bond, note, lease, contract, evidence of indebtedness, debt, or other obligation of the state or local governments which are authorized to be issued under the Constitution or other laws of this state, including refunding bonds.

"Project" means and includes the acquisition of real property for water reservoirs; the construction and reconstruction or improvement of water reservoirs; the acquisition of real or personal property surrounding water reservoirs or any interest in such property; the acquisition of real or personal property or any interest therein for mitigation of any alteration of environmental resources by the construction of a water reservoir or water supply system; and all necessary and usual water facilities useful for obtaining one or more sources of water supply, the treatment of water, and the distribution and sale of water to users and consumers, including counties and municipalities for the purpose of resale, inside and outside the territorial boundaries of the users and consumers, and the operation, maintenance, additions, improvements, and extensions of such facilities so as to assure an adequate water utility system deemed to be necessary or convenient for the efficient operation of such type of undertaking, including, but not limited to, the development or expansion of water facilities or systems so as to facilitate transitioning households and businesses served by private wells, septic tanks, and other nonreturning water systems to public water or sewerage systems, thereby promoting water conservation, all for the essential public purpose of providing water facilities and services to meet public health and environmental standards and to aid the development of trade, commerce, industry, agriculture, and employment opportunities.

"Water facilities" means any projects, structures, and other real or personal property acquired, rehabilitated, constructed, or planned for the purposes of supplying, distributing, and treating water and diverting, channeling, or controlling water flow and head, including, but not limited to, surface or ground water, canals, reservoirs, channels, basins, dams, aqueducts, standpipes, penstocks, conduits, pipelines, mains, pumping stations, water distribution systems, compensating reservoirs, intake stations, waterworks or sources of water supply, wells, purification or filtration plants or other treatment plants and works, connections, water meters, mechanical equipment, electric generating equipment, rights of flowage or division, and other plant structures, equipment, conveyances, real or personal property or rights therein and appurtenances, furnishings, accessories, and devices thereto necessary or useful and convenient for the collection, conveyance, distribution, pumping, treatment, storing, or disposing of water.

"Waters of the state" has the meaning provided by Code Section

12-5-22

.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-471

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1304, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342; Ga. L. 2010, p. 949, § 1/HB 244.)

12-5-472. Acquisition, construction, and maintenance of projects authorized; standards and procedures; sites inventory; mitigation banks; costs.

The division may acquire, design, construct, equip, operate, maintain, expand, and improve a project, in whole or in part, directly or under contract with others, including each of the facilities described in paragraph (10) of Code Section 12-5-471, for the purpose of promoting the use of the projects and the use of the industrial, recreational, commercial, and natural resources of the State of Georgia for the public good and general welfare; and, without limitation of the foregoing, the division is authorized to acquire land for such purposes; provided, however, that the division shall not engage in competition for customers for its environmental services with any local government offering or providing similar services.

Any project acquired, designed, constructed, equipped, operated, maintained, expanded, or improved by the division or which is funded in whole or in part by the division shall conform to and meet standards and procedures promulgated by the Board of Natural Resources pursuant to specific statutory authorization and direction for watershed and wetlands protection.

No such project shall include an electrical generation facility unless such facility does not cause the consumption of water from such reservoir for the generation of such power.

The local government or the division shall acquire sufficient land surrounding any reservoir funded in whole or in part by the division or acquired or constructed by the division to protect such reservoir, to provide for future expansion of such reservoir, and to provide passive recreational opportunities on and around such reservoir. No development shall be permitted on any such reservoir or its surrounding lands so acquired other than public development appropriate for such passive uses. The acquisition of such lands shall be a cost of project for purposes of this article, and the division, the authority, and the local government may utilize any funds available to them for such purposes.

Any such surrounding lands transferred to the state shall be part of the state park system under the control of the department pursuant to Code Section 12-3-31, and the management of passive recreational uses of any such surrounding lands controlled by the state shall be vested in the Parks, Recreation and Historic Sites Division; except that, where it is not feasible to manage such land as a state park, then such surrounding lands transferred to the state may be managed as wildlife management areas by the Wildlife Resources Division of the department. Any such surrounding lands acquired by a local government shall be a local government park.

All uses of any reservoirs funded by the division in whole or in part or acquired or constructed by the division and any surrounding lands acquired by the division or local government or transferred to the state shall be subordinate to the use of such reservoirs for water supply purposes.

No motorized vessels other than those being operated by electric motors shall be allowed on any reservoirs funded by the division in whole or in part or acquired or constructed by the division. As used in this paragraph, the term "vessel" has the meaning provided by Code Section 52-7-3.

The division, in cooperation with the department, shall take all reasonable steps at the earliest practicable date to inventory and survey feasible sites for water reservoirs within the State of Georgia. The director shall present a progress report of such inventory and survey to the legislative oversight committee created by Code Section 12-5-484 not later than October 1, 2008, together with a report describing measures undertaken by the division and the authority to expedite the accomplishment of the purposes of this article. The director shall thereafter report quarterly to such committee on the activities of the division and progress toward the accomplishment of such purposes in such format as may be directed by the cochairpersons of such committee. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the division take all reasonable and practicable steps to expedite the accomplishment of such purposes and that the division utilize its reporting responsibilities to apprise the committee promptly of legal, statutory, or other barriers to expedited accomplishment of such purposes, together with recommended measures to mitigate or avoid such barriers.

The division may take all reasonable and practicable steps, in consultation with the Environmental Protection Division of the department, the Department of Transportation, and other appropriate state agencies, to create a wetlands mitigation bank or banks and a stream mitigation bank or banks for the purpose of facilitating the construction of projects. Costs and expenses of such bank or banks shall constitute costs of projects and shall be allocated to projects when appropriate.

Costs of projects and other expenses incurred by the division for purposes of this article may be paid from funds made available to the division for such purposes and may be financed or paid by the authority as provided by Article 1 of Chapter 23 of Title 50.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-472

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1304, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

12-5-472.1. Procurement of permits, licenses, and permissions; designation of principal state agency.

The division shall be authorized to assume by intergovernmental contract the responsibility for procuring all permits, licenses, and permissions from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof; the State of Georgia, its departments, agencies, or authorities; or any county or municipality of this state as necessary or required for the purpose of constructing any projects within this state on behalf of local governments seeking to construct such projects. Such contract may provide for the reimbursement of the division for costs and expenses associated with the procurement of such permits, licenses, and permissions, but such reimbursement shall not be a prerequisite to the assumption by the division of such procurement responsibility, and the division is specifically authorized to delay, mitigate, or waive reimbursement when, in the judgment of the director and the authority, the welfare and best interests of the people of this state are served thereby. The terms of such contract shall provide for the assumption by such local government of such permits, licenses, and permissions at such time as appropriate for the construction of such projects.

In discharging its duties and responsibilities pursuant to the terms of this article, and specifically in identifying appropriate sites for projects and procuring permits, licenses, and permissions for projects, whether owned by the division or otherwise, the division shall utilize to the maximum extent practicable the procurement of services from the department and private sector persons and entities qualified to perform such work. It is the intent of General Assembly that the division minimize the hiring of officers and employees for the purposes of this article.

The division shall be designated as the principal state agency to cooperate with the Environmental Protection Division of the department, the United States Army Corps of Engineers, and all other federal agencies or instrumentalities in the planning and execution of projects in this state.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-472.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

12-5-473. Powers of Water Supply Division generally.

The division shall have the following powers:

To acquire real and personal property of every kind and character by purchase, gift, lease, or otherwise and to own, hold, improve, use, sell, convey, exchange, transfer, lease, sublease, and dispose of the same, or any interest therein, for its services, purposes, duties, responsibilities, or functions pursuant to this article; and any local government may grant, sell, or otherwise alienate leaseholds, real and personal property, or any interest therein to the division. Site selection for a project shall be made after consideration of input from local governments to be served by the project;

To make all contracts and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient to its services, purposes, duties, responsibilities, or functions pursuant to this article;

To accept grants of money or materials or property of any kind from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof; the State of Georgia, its departments, agencies, or authorities; or any county or municipality of this state, upon the terms and conditions as may be imposed thereon to the extent the terms and conditions are not inconsistent with the limitations and laws of this state and are otherwise within the power of the division;

To make and execute contracts, lease agreements, and all other instruments necessary to exercise the powers of the division to further the public purpose for which this article was enacted, such contracts, leases, or instruments to include contracts for construction, operation, management, or maintenance of projects and facilities owned by a local government or by the state or any state authority; and any and all local governments and departments, institutions, authorities, or agencies of the state may enter into contracts, leases, agreements, or other instruments with the division upon such terms and to transfer real and personal property to the state for the use of the division for such consideration and for such purposes as they deem advisable;

To collect fees and charges in connection with its commitments, management services, and servicing, including, but not limited to, reimbursements of costs of financing, as the division shall determine to be reasonable;

To provide advisory, management, technical, consultative, training, educational, and project assistance services to the state and local governments and to enter into contracts with the state and local governments to provide such services. The state and local governments may enter into contracts with the division for such services and to pay for such services as may be provided them;

To lease to local governments any state owned facilities or property which the division is managing under contract with the state;

To contract with state agencies or any local government for the use by the division of any property or facilities or services of the state or any such state agency or local government or for the use by any state agency or local government of any facilities or services of the division, and such state agencies and local governments may enter into such contracts;

To receive and use the proceeds of any tax levied by a local government to pay all or any part of the cost of any project or for any other purpose for which the division may use its own funds pursuant to this article;

To cooperate and act in conjunction with industrial, commercial, medical, scientific, public interest, or educational organizations; with agencies of the federal government and this state and local governments; with other states and their political subdivisions; and with joint agencies thereof, and such state agencies, local governments, and joint agencies may cooperate and act in conjunction, and to enter into contracts or agreements with the division and local governments to achieve or further the policies of the state declared in this article; and

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers conferred by this article and to enter into such agreements with the department as are necessary and useful for such purpose. The department is expressly authorized to enter into agreements with the division for such purposes.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-473

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1304, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

12-5-474. Rentals, fees, and other charges; deposit of funds; terms and conditions for use of project.

The division may fix rentals, fees, prices, and other charges which any user, concessionaire, franchisee, or vendor shall pay to the division for the use of a project or part thereof or combination thereof, and for the goods and services provided by the division in conjunction with such use, as the division may deem necessary or appropriate to provide in connection with such use, and to charge and collect the same. Such rentals, fees, prices, and other charges shall be so fixed and adjusted in respect to the aggregate thereof from a project or any part thereof so as to be reasonably expected to provide a fund sufficient with other revenues of such project and funds available to the division, if any, to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating a project, including the reserves for extraordinary repairs and insurance, unless such cost shall be otherwise provided for, which costs shall be deemed to include the expenses incurred by the division on account of a project for water, light, sewer, and other services furnished by other facilities at such project. Such fees shall be fixed after consideration of input from local governments served by the project to which the fees pertain.

All those funds generated by the operation of the projects and paid to the division shall be deposited in the Georgia Reservoir Fund established by Code Section 50-23-28.

The division may establish the terms and conditions upon which any lessee, sublessee, licensee, user, franchisee, or vendor shall be authorized to use a project as the division may determine necessary or appropriate, subject to the limitations provided for by this article.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-474

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1304, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

12-5-475. Rules and regulations.

It shall be the duty of the authority, in consultation with the Environmental Protection Division of the department, to prescribe rules and regulations governing the selection of sites for projects. Such rules and regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to, provisions for:

The division to notify in writing a county or municipality when a preliminary determination has been made for the location of a project within any portion of the territorial boundaries of such county or municipality;

Review and comment by the governing authority of a county or municipality receiving a notice provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection before the division makes a final determination of the project site; and

At least one public hearing within the territorial boundaries of a county or municipality receiving a notice provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection before the division makes a final determination of the project site.

It shall be the duty of the authority to prescribe rules and regulations for the operation of and governing the use of each project constructed under the provisions of this article. Such rules shall be prescribed after consideration of input from local governments served or to be served by the project to which the rules pertain.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-475

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1304, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

12-5-476. Contracts with local governments for planning, construction, management, and maintenance; coordination.

The division may contract with any local government to exercise on behalf of such local government such responsibility in connection with the planning, design, acquisition, construction, operation, management, and maintenance of a project of such local government, as is now or may be hereafter vested in the local government, and to provide to the local government goods or services of the division in connection with the planning, design, acquisition, construction, operation, management, and maintenance of any project of the local government, all as the parties to the contract may determine appropriate. Any such local government shall be authorized by such contract to delegate to the division all or such goods or services of the division in connection with the planning, design, acquisition, construction, operation, management, and maintenance of a project as the parties may by contract determine appropriate.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any such contract shall provide that the local government shall reimburse the division for all of the costs, liabilities, and expenses of the division incurred by the division in exercising such powers or providing such goods or services; and the division shall not directly or indirectly be liable for any liability, cost, or expense incurred by such local government in the acquisition, construction, operation, management, or maintenance of a project.

If, in order to accomplish the objectives of this article, it is advisable, in the judgment of the director and the authority, to construct a project that is larger than one which a local government proposes to construct, the division may participate by agreement with such local government in planning, designing, constructing, operating, and maintaining such project and, in so participating, shall finance those costs of the project allocated to the state and such other and further costs as may be agreed upon between the parties, such that the project shall accomplish the maximum water development objectives at a minimum total expenditure.

The division shall coordinate with the Environmental Protection Division of the department and local governments for the purpose of producing appropriate and necessary needs analyses for projects. In the event that the director, with the approval of the authority, determines that construction of a project is in the best interests of the people of this state but any affected county or municipality is willing but unable to engage in an appropriate needs analysis, the division may conduct such analysis for and on behalf of such county or municipality, and such analysis shall be the needs analysis of such county or municipality with respect to such project for all purposes. Such needs analysis shall be consistent with water demand projections provided by an applicable regional water development and conservation plan developed pursuant to Article 8 of this chapter, if available.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-476

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1304, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

12-5-476.1. Fees for services.

The division and the department may enter into agreements with local governments, setting fees to be paid to the division or the department for the purpose of enabling the division or the department to expedite or enhance the state regulatory process and to provide services voluntarily requested under the agreement with respect to projects. Pursuant to such an agreement, the division or the department may hire additional temporary staff members, contract for services, or provide additional services that are within the powers of the division and the department to provide. Such service costs shall constitute a cost of project for purposes of this article and Chapter 23 of Title 50. As part of an agreement entered into under this subsection, the division and the department may waive all or part of a fee imposed for a service. The division and the department shall not require that a local government pay more for a service under an agreement entered into under this subsection than the cost to the division or the department in providing such service to such local government.

The division and the department may enter into agreements with agencies or instrumentalities of the federal government, setting fees to be paid by the division or the department for the purpose of enabling the division or the department to expedite or enhance the federal regulatory process and to provide services requested under the agreement with respect to projects. Pursuant to such agreement, the division and the department may fund the cost of hiring additional temporary staff members, contracts for services, or the provision of additional services for the purposes of this article. Such fees shall constitute a cost of project for purposes of this article and Chapter 23 of Title 50.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-476.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

12-5-477. Supplemental nature of provisions.

The provisions of this article shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of things authorized by this article and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by the Constitution and laws of the State of Georgia and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-477

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1304, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

12-5-478. Liberal construction.

This article, being for the welfare of this state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-478

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1304, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

12-5-479. Contracts with public entities for services or use of facilities or equipment; user agreement for provision of environmental services.

In the exercise of its powers under this article, the division may contract with any public entity which shall include the state or any institution, department, or other agency thereof or any county, municipality, school district, or other political subdivision of the state or with any other public agency, public corporation, or public authority, for joint services, for the provision of services, or for the joint or separate use of facilities or equipment with respect to such activities, services, or facilities which the contracting parties are authorized by law to undertake or provide.

Pursuant to any such contract, in connection with any facility authorized under this article, the division may undertake such facility or provide such services or facilities of the division, in whole or in part, to or for the benefit of the public entity contracting with the division with respect to those activities, services, or facilities which the contracting public entity is authorized by the Constitution and law to provide, including, but not limited to, those set forth in Article IX, Section III, Paragraph I of the Constitution, and any such contracting public entity may undertake to pay the division for such activities, services, or facilities such amounts and upon such terms as the parties may determine.

The state and each institution, department, or other agency thereof or each county, municipality, school district, or other political subdivision of this state and each public agency, public corporation, or public authority may contract with the division in connection with any activity, service, or facility which such public entity is otherwise authorized to provide to obtain the performance of such activity or provision of such services or facilities through the division.

In connection with its operations, the division may similarly obtain from, and each public entity may provide, such activities, services, or facilities which the division is authorized to provide.

Reserved.

A local government by resolution of its governing body may enter into a user agreement for the provision of environmental services utilizing facilities owned by the state upon such terms and conditions as the division shall determine to be reasonable, including, but not limited to, the reimbursement of all costs of construction and financing and claims arising therefrom.

No user agreement shall be deemed to be a contract subject to any law requiring that contracts shall be let only after receipt of competitive bids.

Any user agreement directly between the state or division and a local government may contain provisions requiring the local government:

To establish and collect rents, rates, fees, and charges so as to produce revenues sufficient to pay all or a specified portion of:

The costs of operation, maintenance, renewal, and repairs of the water facility; and

Outstanding bonds, revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations incurred for the purposes of such water facility and to provide for the payment of all amounts as they shall become due and payable under the terms of such agreement, including amounts for the creation and maintenance of any required reserves;

To create and maintain reasonable reserves or other special funds;

To create and maintain a special fund or funds as additional security for the punctual payment of any rentals due under such user agreement and for the deposit therein of such revenues as shall be sufficient to pay all user fees and any other amounts becoming due under such user agreements as the same shall become due and payable; or

To perform such other acts and take such other action as may be deemed necessary and desirable by the division to secure the complete and punctual performance by such local government of such lease agreements and to provide for the remedies of the division in the event of a default by such local government in such payment.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-479

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1304, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

12-5-480. Use of services of Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission; selection of professional services.

The division shall be authorized to utilize the financial advisory and construction related services of the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission with respect to the acquisition, design, planning, and construction of any of the projects. Code Section 50-22-9 shall be applicable to the selection of persons to provide professional services for any project or any portion thereof authorized by this article until such time as the director, with the approval of the authority and consistent with any state-wide water plan provided pursuant to Article 8 of this chapter, certifies that this state and its local governments have constructed or otherwise acquired sufficient reservoir capacity to meet current and reasonably projected future needs, taking into account projected population growth and historical and anticipated cycles or incidents of drought, whereupon the whole of Chapter 22 of Title 50 shall be applicable.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-480

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1304, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

12-5-481. Legislative findings.

It is found, determined, and declared that the carrying out of the purposes of the division as defined in this article is in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and that the purposes are public purposes; that the division will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by this article; and that the activities authorized in this article will develop and promote trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities to the public good and the general welfare and promote the general welfare of the state.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-481

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1304, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

12-5-482. Failure of local government to collect and remit all amounts due; withholding of state funds.

In the event of a failure of any local government to collect and remit in full all amounts due which involve the credit or guarantee of the state or the authority, it shall be the duty of the state treasurer or the duty of the authority to withhold all funds of the state and all funds administered by the state, its agencies, boards, and instrumentalities or all funds of the authority allotted to such local government until such local government has collected and remitted in full all sums due and cured or remedied all defaults, unless such amounts have been waived pursuant to this article.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall mandate the withholding of funds allocated to a local government which would violate contracts to which the state or the authority is a party, the requirements of federal law imposed on the state or the authority, or judgments of any court binding the state or the authority.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-482

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1304, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.)

12-5-483. Waiver of costs or fees.

Any waiver by the division or the department of any costs or fees owed by any local government to the division or the department under this article shall constitute a grant in the amount of such waiver to such local government pursuant to Code Section 50-23-6 or Article VII, Section III, Paragraph II of the Constitution.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-483

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, Code Section 12-5-483, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 644,

§

1-4/SB 342, was redesignated as Code Section 12-5-31.1.

12-5-484. Legislative oversight committee; membership; responsibilities.

There is created as a joint committee of the General Assembly the Georgia Water Supply Act Legislative Oversight Committee, to be composed of the members of the House Committee on Natural Resources and Environment and the Senate Natural Resources and the Environment Committee. The chairpersons of such committees shall serve as cochairpersons of the oversight committee. The oversight committee shall periodically inquire into and review the operations of the division, as well as periodically review and evaluate the success with which the division is accomplishing its statutory duties and functions as provided in this article. The oversight committee may conduct any independent audit or investigation of the division it deems necessary.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-484

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 2-1/SB 342.)